Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2712.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-28-19 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-28 entitled "State
Police" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-28-19. Police powers of members — Fees — Duties — Suppression of riots.
Members of the division shall have and may exercise in any part of the state, with regard
to the enforcement of the criminal laws, and municipal ordinances, all powers of deputy sheriffs,
town sergeants, chiefs of police, police officers, and town constables. For purposes of enforcing
municipal ordinances, members of the division shall have authority to enforce only those
ordinances that provide for civil penalties and shall not enforce any ordinance for which a term of
imprisonment may be imposed. Any person authorized to issue criminal process may direct that
process to any member of the division. All fees received by members of the division in connection
with the performance of their duties shall be paid to the general treasurer for the use of the state. It
shall be the duty of its members to prevent and detect crime; to apprehend and assist in the
prosecution of offenders; and to assist in the investigation and prosecution of any criminal matters
within the state. The governor may command their services in the suppression of riots, but they
shall not exercise their powers within the limits of any city to suppress rioting except by direction
of the governor and upon the request of the mayor or chief of police of any city.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005527
========
LC005527 - Page 2 of 3